District of Columbia statutes.
20-504

Form of letters.

Letters of administration shall be in substantially the following form:

LETTERS OF ADMINISTRATION

To all persons who may be interested in the estate of _______________, deceased:

Administration of the estate of the deceased has been granted on _________ to _________ (and the will of the deceased was probated on ______________________). This administration (is) (is not) (strike the inapplicable language) subject to continuing supervision of the Court. The powers of the personal representative (are not limited) (are limited as follows: _________ ). The appointment is in full force and effect as of this date.

(SEAL)

Witness:

Dated:

Register of Wills.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(x), 42 DCR 63
This section is referenced in § 20-744.
1981 Ed., § 20-504.
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-501.